New York, session 2025-2026, A11057.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 927 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 927. Type 1 diabetes informational materials. 1. The department, in 4 consultation with the department of health, shall develop informational 5 materials on type 1 diabetes. Such informational materials shall be made 6 available through the department's website to each school district, 7 board of cooperative educational services, charter school, and any other 8 school providing elementary education. The informational materials shall 9 be made available in English, Spanish, and any other language that is 10 required by law or that the office deems appropriate. 11 2. At the beginning of the two thousand twenty-six--two thousand twen- 12 ty-seven school year, the board of education or trustees of each school 13 district and the governing body of each charter school shall provide the 14 type 1 diabetes informational materials to the parent or guardian of 15 each student enrolled in the school district or school. Thereafter, 16 such information shall be provided to the parent or guardian of each new 17 student upon initial enrollment in the school district or school at any 18 grade level. 19 3. Information provided to parents and guardians pursuant to this 20 section shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the follow- 21 ing: 22 (a) A description of type 1 diabetes; 23 (b) A description of the risk factors and warning signs associated 24 with type 1 diabetes; 25 (c) A recommendation that parents or guardians of students displaying 26 warning signs associated with type 1 diabetes should immediately consult EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15552-01-6 A. 11057 2 1 with the student's primary care provider to determine if autoantibody 2 screening for type 1 diabetes is appropriate; 3 (d) A description of the autoantibody screening process for type 1 4 diabetes and the implications of test results; and 5 (e) A recommendation that, following a positive autoantibody test for 6 type 1 diabetes, parents or guardians should consult with the student's 7 primary care provider to develop an appropriate treatment plan, which 8 may include consultation with and examination by a specialty care 9 provider, including, but not limited to, a properly qualified endocri- 10 nologist. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.